Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.765

Retirement for service.

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)(i) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

(ii) Any member who retired on or after September 1, 2008, and chose the three percent per year reduction provided under (a) of this subsection shall have a retirement allowance recalculated under the reductions of (b)(i) of this subsection for benefit payments made on or after January 1, 2024.

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

[ 2023 c 410 s 2; 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1; 2007 c 491 s 2; 2000 c 247 s 902; 1991 c 343 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 410: "It is the intent of the legislature to remove some of the restrictions on the types and amount of postretirement employment that members that chose the enhanced early retirement formula created in 2008 for the public employees', school employees', and teachers' retirement systems plans 2 and 3 can perform while in receipt of a retirement allowance. This change simplifies administration of the retirement system and could assist employers currently experiencing difficulties recruiting and retaining employees. In addition, some employees were offered and accepted a choice of lower early retirement benefits without the work-related benefit restrictions that are now being removed from those that chose higher benefits. The legislature intends those employees not be penalized for that choice after the employment-related benefit restrictions are removed. Therefore, pursuant to this act, the legislature intends that the employees that chose the three percent per year early retirement reduction and fewer benefit restrictions, rather than the 2008 early retirement formula with restrictions now being removed, shall have their benefit reduction recalculated to the level of the 2008 reduction for benefits made on or after January 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 410 s 1.]

Effective date—2023 c 410: "This act takes effect January 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 410 s 11.]

Benefits not contractual right until September 1, 2008—2007 c 491: "The new benefits provided pursuant to sections 2(3)(b), 4(3)(b), 6(3)(b), and 8(3)(b), chapter 491, Laws of 2007 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to September 1, 2008, and will not become a contractual right thereafter if the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 491 s 15.]

Severability—2007 c 491: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 491 s 18.]

Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with a final determination by the federal internal revenue service that is a prescribed condition to favorable tax treatment of one or more of the retirement plans, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the individual members directly affected. This finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the members concerned. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this act in the future as may be required to comply with a final federal determination that amendment or repeal is necessary to maintain the favorable tax treatment of a plan." [ 2007 c 491 s 14.]

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Effective date—Severability—Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.